Utah statutes.
63B-1-312.   Signature of former member or officer of authority --
Continuing validity.
If any of the members or officers of the authority no longer occupy their
position at the time of the delivery of any obligations signed by them, their
signatures or facsimiles of their signatures are valid and sufficient for all
purposes, as if they had remained in office until that delivery.
